District of Columbia statutes.
2-1215.55

Mount Vernon Triangle BID.

(a)

The formation of the Mount Vernon Triangle BID, which shall include all taxable property within the geographic areas set forth in subsection (b) of this section, is hereby authorized and the BID taxes established in subsection (c) of this section are hereby imposed through the expiration date of this subchapter [May 29, 2016] or the termination or dissolution of the BID.

(b)

The Mount Vernon Triangle BID shall be comprised of the geographic area bounded by a line that begins at the center of the intersection of Seventh Street, N.W., and New York Avenue, N.W.; and continues northeast down the middle of New York Avenue, N.W., until it reaches New Jersey Avenue, N.W.; and continues southeast down the middle of New Jersey Avenue, N.W., until it reaches Massachusetts Avenue, N.W.; and continues northwest down the middle of Massachusetts Avenue, N.W. until it reaches Sixth Street, N.W., and continues north down the middle of Sixth Street, N.W., until it reaches K Street, N.W.; and continues west down the middle of K Street, N.W., until it reaches Seventh Street, N.W.; and continues north down the middle of Seventh Street, N.W., until it reaches the center of the intersection of Seventh Street, N.W., and New York Avenue, N.W. (the beginning point).

(c)

(1)

The BID taxes for the taxable properties in the Mount Vernon Triangle BID shall be:

(A)

The amount of $.35 per square foot of land;

(B)

The amount of $.15 per rentable square foot of commercial buildings; provided, that any supermarket that is receiving a tax incentive pursuant to § 47-3802 shall not be required to pay the BID tax during the term of the incentive;

(C)

The amount of $90 per hotel room annually; and

(D)

(i)

The amount of $120 per unit annually for taxable residential properties.

(ii)

If a residential unit is restricted to residents based upon income pursuant to a Federal or District affordable housing program, the BID tax due on the unit shall be computed by applying the percentage of area median income eligible residents must meet to participate in the affordable housing program to the amount of the BID tax which would otherwise be due.

(2)

Subject to the requirements of § 2-1215.08, the BID taxes set forth in this subsection may be increased by 5%.

May 29, 1996, D.C. Law 11-134, § 205
as added Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-257, § 2(d), 52 DCR 1161
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 140(c), 52 DCR 10637
Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-246, § 2, 54 DCR 618
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 156, 56 DCR 1117
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-161, § 2(t), 61 DCR 10741
This section is referenced in § 47-857.11.
D.C. Law 16-91 made a technical change in the enacting clause of D.C. Law 15-257 which resulted in no change in text.
D.C. Law 16-246 rewrote subsec. (c) which had read as follows: “(c) The BID taxes for the nonexempt real properties in the Mount Vernon Triangle BID shall be 20 cents per square foot of land.”
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in subsec. (c)(2).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-161 substituted “taxable” for “nonexempt real” in (a) and the introductory language of (c)(1); and substituted “taxable” for “nonexempt” in (c)(1)(D)(i).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(t) of the Business Improvement Districts Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-435, Oct. 7, 2014, 61 DCR 10717, 20 STAT 4154).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(t) of the Business Improvement Districts Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-582, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1269, 21 STAT 735).